Utah statutes.
70A-9a-708.   Persons entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

(1)  the secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

(2)  the filing is necessary under this part:

(a)  to continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before this act takes effect; or

(b)  to perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

